Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.530

Individuals with dyslexia—Identification and instruction—Handbook—Reports.

(1) Within available resources, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the school districts that participated in the Lorraine Wojahn dyslexia pilot program, and with an international nonprofit organization dedicated to supporting efforts to provide appropriate identification of and instruction for individuals with dyslexia, shall:

(a) Develop an educator training program to enhance the reading, writing, and spelling skills of students with dyslexia. The training program must provide research-based, multisensory literacy intervention professional development in the areas of dyslexia and intervention implementation. The program shall be posted on the website of the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The training program may be regionally delivered through the educational service districts. The educational service districts may seek assistance from the international nonprofit organization to deliver the training; and

(b) Develop a dyslexia handbook to be used as a reference for teachers and parents of students with dyslexia. The handbook shall be modeled after other state dyslexia handbooks, and shall include guidelines for school districts to follow as they identify and provide services for students with dyslexia. Additionally, the handbook shall provide school districts, and parents and guardians with information regarding the state's relevant statutes and their relation to federal special education laws. The handbook shall be posted on the website of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) Beginning September 1, 2009, and annually thereafter, each educational service district shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the number of individuals who participate in the training developed and offered by the educational service district. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report that information to the legislative education committees.

[ 2009 c 546 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2009 c 546: "Dyslexia is a language-based learning disability that affects individuals throughout their lives. Washington state has a long-standing tradition of working to serve its students with dyslexia. Since 2005, the legislature has provided funding for five pilot projects to implement research-based, multisensory literacy intervention for students with dyslexia. Participating schools were required to have a three-tiered reading structure in place, provide professional development training to teachers, assess students, and collect and maintain data on student progress.

The legislature finds that the students receiving intervention support through the dyslexia pilot projects have made substantial and steady academic gains. The legislature intends to sustain this work and expand the implementation to a level of statewide support for students with dyslexia by developing and providing information and training, including a handbook to continue to improve the skills of our students with dyslexia." [ 2009 c 546 s 1.]